Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4043
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing
the Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act, consideration must be given to
the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter
among the states that enact it.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 43.